District of Columbia statutes.
16-4013

Standards of professional responsibility and mandatory reporting not affected.

This chapter does not affect:

(1)

The professional responsibility obligations and standards applicable to a lawyer or other licensed professional; or

(2)

The obligation of a person to report abuse, neglect, abandonment, or exploitation of a child or adult under the law of the District of Columbia.

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 13 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.